Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.435

Historic preservation—Authorization to acquire property, borrow money, issue bonds, etc.

Any county may acquire title to or any interest in real and personal property for the purpose of historic preservation and may restore, improve, maintain, manage, and lease the property for public or private use and may enter into contracts, borrow money, and issue bonds and other obligations for such purposes. This authorization shall not expand the eminent domain powers of counties.

[ 1984 c 203 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—1984 c 203: See note following RCW 35.43.140.